Utah statutes.
77-19-3.   Special release from city or county jail -- Purposes.
(1)  Any person incarcerated in any city or county jail may, in accordance
with the release policy of the facility, be released from jail during those
hours which are reasonable and necessary to accomplish any of the purposes
under Subsection (2) if:
(a)  the offense is not one for which release is prohibited under state law;
and
(b)  the judge has not entered an order prohibiting a special release.
(2)  The custodial authority at the jail may release an inmate who qualifies
under Subsection (1) for:
(a)  working at his employment;
(b)  seeking employment;
(c)  attending an educational institution;
(d)  obtaining necessary medical treatment; or
(e)  any other reasonable purpose as determined by the custodial authority of
the jail.
